Utah statutes.
63E-1-303.   Recommendations of the committee.

After the committee has reviewed a proposal to create an independent entity in accordance with Section 63E-1-302, the committee shall make a report to the Legislature stating whether the committee:

(1)  recommends creation of the proposed independent entity;

(2)  recommends that the proposed independent entity not be created; or

(3)  makes no recommendation regarding the creation of the proposed independent entity.

